New York, session 2025-2026, S1975.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent and purpose. It is the intent of this 2 legislature to ensure the prompt response of designated agencies to 3 emergency calls and situations. During emergencies time is of the 4 essence and precious moments may be lost when fire, police and other 5 emergency personnel are unable to quickly locate those in need. The 6 legislature therefore declares that it is necessary to require that all 7 premises be identified through the display of their numerical address in 8 a conspicuous location. 9 § 2. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new section 10 125-b to read as follows: 11 § 125-b. Street numbers. 1. Requirements. The owner, agent, lessee or 12 other person in charge of any building upon a street to which street 13 numbers of buildings have been assigned, in which such building is situ- 14 ated, shall cause the proper street number or numbers of such buildings 15 to be displayed in such manner that the street number or numbers may at 16 all times be plainly legible from the sidewalk in front of such build- 17 ing. The term "front" as used in this section shall be construed to mean 18 that side of the building which faces the street on which the number or 19 numbers of such building, or premises on which such building is situ- 20 ated, have been allotted. The number or numbers shall be displayed on 21 such side of such building or premises. Each city shall have the power 22 to establish and enforce rules and regulations relating to the size, 23 form, visibility and location of street numbers in accordance with the 24 requirements of this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02972-01-5 S. 1975 2 1 2. Violations. If the owner, lessee, agent or other person in charge 2 of any building in any city upon a street to which street numbers of 3 buildings have been assigned in which such building is situated shall 4 fail to display the proper street number of such building, as provided 5 in the foregoing subdivision, the city in which such building is situ- 6 ated shall forthwith serve such person or persons with a copy of this 7 section, and if after thirty days' notice the owner, lessee, agent or 8 other person in charge of such building shall fail or neglect to comply 9 with the provisions thereof, such owner, lessee, agent or other person 10 shall be subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars, which shall be 11 used for and collected in the name of the city. Any person who shall 12 continue any such violation shall be punished by an additional fine of 13 five dollars for each day such violation shall continue. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law.